California, session 20252026, AB1046.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 42652.7 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:42652.7. Article 10 (commencing with Section 18991.1) of Chapter 12 of Division 7 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations does not apply to an agricultural crop preparation service, as defined in Section 3001 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, that demonstrates to the department, in a form and manner developed by the department, that it has not disposed of organic waste, including, but not limited to, culls, fruit skins, hulls, leaves, seed pits, shells, and sticks, in a landfill on or after January 1, 2016.